Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 28
CORONER

Sec.

§ 31-2801. Inquests.

The coroner must hold inquests as prescribed in the Penal Code.

§ 31-2802. Burial or cremation of unclaimed bodies.

When no person takes charge of the body of the deceased within fourteen (14) days of death, the coroner shall cause the body to be decently interred or cremated; and if there is not sufficient property belonging to the estate of the deceased to pay the necessary expenses of the burial or cremation, the expenses are a legal charge against the county pursuant to the provisions of section 31-3412, Idaho Code.

§ 31-2803. Disposal of property found on corpse.

The coroner must within thirty (30) days after an inquest upon a dead body, deliver to the county treasurer or the legal representatives of the deceased, any money or other property found upon the body.

§ 31-2804. Verified statement required of coroner.

Before auditing or allowing the accounts of the coroner, the commissioners must require him to file with the clerk of the board a statement in writing, verified by his affidavit, showing:

The amount of money or other property belonging to the estate of a deceased person which has come into his possession since his last statement.

The disposition made of such property.

§ 31-2805. District judge or whomever he assigns to act as coroner.

If the office of coroner is vacant, or he is absent or unable to attend, the duties of his office may be discharged by any district judge or whomever he assigns for the county, with the like authority, and subject to the same obligations and penalties, as the coroner.

§ 31-2806. Coroner to act as substitute for sheriff.

The coroner shall be authorized to act as the substitute for the county sheriff when the sheriff declares he is disqualified from acting due to a conflict of interest in a proceeding or matter; provided, however, that the senior deputy sheriff, as defined in section 31-2006, Idaho Code, shall temporarily fill the vacancy created by the death, absence or resignation of the sheriff.

§ 31-2807. Powers when acting as sheriff.

Whenever the coroner acts as sheriff, he possesses the powers, and may perform all the duties, of sheriff, and is liable on his official bond, in like manner as a sheriff would be; and is entitled to the same fees as are allowed by law to the sheriff for similar services.

§ 31-2808. Making final disposition of dead human bodies prohibited.

No coroner or person acting as coroner who is a licensed funeral director or a licensed mortician, owner, proprietor or employee of any establishment engaged in making final disposition of dead human bodies, and no establishment with which such coroner or person acting as coroner is associated, shall, except for ambulance services, perform any of the services of a funeral director or mortician or furnish any materials connected with or incidental to the final disposition of the body of any person whose death is required by law to be investigated by such coroner or other person acting in that capacity. Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not be applicable in counties wherein there is only one (1) licensed funeral establishment.

§ 31-2809. Coroner may appoint deputies.

A coroner may appoint a deputy or deputies as he deems necessary. Deputy coroners shall be paid at a rate fixed by the county commissioners.

§ 31-2810. Continuing education requirements.

After January 1, 2010, each county coroner shall complete twenty-four (24) hours of continuing education on a biennial calendar basis. The Idaho state association of county coroners shall either sponsor or provide courses pursuant to this section and monitor this requirement.